Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 311,257
(2) Extraordinary expenses ............ $ 21,839
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5513 (SB 5513-A) Page 1